Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.340

Survival of remedy after dissolution.

The dissolution of a corporation either (1) by the filing with the secretary of state of its articles of dissolution, (2) by administrative dissolution by the secretary of state, (3) by a decree of court, or (4) by expiration of its period of duration shall not take away or impair any remedy available against such corporation, its directors, officers, or shareholders, for any right or claim existing, or any liability incurred, prior to such dissolution or arising thereafter, unless action or other proceeding thereon is not commenced within two years after the effective date of any dissolution that was effective prior to June 7, 2006, or within three years after the effective date of any dissolution that is effective on or after June 7, 2006. Any such action or proceeding against the corporation may be defended by the corporation in its corporate name.

[ 2006 c 52 s 17; 1995 c 47 s 5; 1990 c 178 s 6; 1989 c 165 s 167.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1990 c 178: See note following RCW 23B.01.220.